North Carolina, session 2025, SB498.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Beaufort for upgrades
and repairs to the Town's boat docks.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S498-v-1*